docker/build/vendor/latexprinter/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-da.tex
% This file is part of hyph-utf8 package and resulted from
% semi-manual conversions of hyphenation patterns into UTF-8 in June 2008.
%
% Source: dkcommon.tex (yyyy-mm-dd), dkspecial.tex (yyyy-mm-dd)
% Author: Frank Jensen <frank.jensen at hugin.com>
%
% The above mentioned file should become obsolete,
% and the author of the original file should preferably modify this file instead.
%
% Modifications were needed in order to support native UTF-8 engines,
% but functionality (hopefully) didn't change in any way, at least not intentionally.
% This file is no longer stand-alone; at least for 8-bit engines
% you probably want to use loadhyph-foo.tex (which will load this file) instead.
%
% Modifications were done by Jonathan Kew, Mojca Miklavec & Arthur Reutenauer
% with help & support from:
% - Karl Berry, who gave us free hands and all resources
% - Taco Hoekwater, with useful macros
% - Hans Hagen, who did the unicodification of patterns already long before
%               and helped with testing, suggestions and bug reports
% - Norbert Preining, who tested & integrated patterns into TeX Live
%
% However, the "copyright/copyleft" owner of patterns remains the original author.
%
% The copyright statement of this file is thus:
%
%    Do with this file whatever needs to be done in future for the sake of
%    "a better world" as long as you respect the copyright of original file.
%    If you're the original author of patterns or taking over a new revolution,
%    plese remove all of the TUG comments & credits that we added here -
%    you are the Queen / the King, we are only the servants.
%
% If you want to change this file, rather than uploading directly to CTAN,
% we would be grateful if you could send it to us (http://tug.org/tex-hyphen)
% or ask for credentials for SVN repository and commit it yourself;
% we will then upload the whole "package" to CTAN.
%
% Before a new "pattern-revolution" starts,
% please try to follow some guidelines if possible:
%
% - \lccode is *forbidden*, and I really mean it
% - all the patterns should be in UTF-8
% - the only "allowed" TeX commands in this file are: \patterns, \hyphenation,
%   and if you really cannot do without, also \input and \message
% - in particular, please no \catcode or \lccode changes,
%   they belong to loadhyph-foo.tex,
%   and no \lefthyphenmin and \righthyphenmin,
%   they have no influence here and belong elsewhere
% - \begingroup and/or \endinput is not needed
% - feel free to do whatever you want inside comments
%
% We know that TeX is extremely powerful, but give a stupid parser
% at least a chance to read your patterns.
%
% For more unformation see
%
%    http://tug.org/tex-hyphen
%
%------------------------------------------------------------------------------
%
% This file contains the hyphenation patterns for Danish.
%
%% Copyright 1994 Frank Jensen (Frank.Jensen@hugin.com)
%
% This work may be distributed and/or modified under the
% conditions of the LaTeX Project Public License, either version 1.3
% of this license or (at your option) any later version.
% The latest version of this license is in
%   http://www.latex-project.org/lppl.txt
% and version 1.3 or later is part of all distributions of LaTeX
% version 2003/12/01 or later.
%
% Changes:
% - 2011-01-11 - remove support for OT1 encoding
%
\patterns{
.ae3
.an3k
.an1s
.be5la
.be1t
.bi4tr
.der3i
.diagno5
.her3
.hoved3
.ne4t5
.om1
.ove4
.po1
.til3
.yd5r
ab5le
3abst
a3c
ade5la
5adg
a1e
5afg
5a4f1l
af3r
af4ri
5afs
a4gef
a4gi
ag5in
ag5si
3agti
a4gy
a3h
ais5t
a3j
a5ka
a3ke
a5kr
aku5
a3la
a1le
a1li
al3k
4alkv
a1lo
al5si
a3lu
a1ly
am4pa
3analy
an4k5r
a3nu
3anv
a5o
a5pe
a3pi
a5po
a1ra
ar5af
1arb
a1re
5arg
a1ri
a3ro
a3sa
a3sc
a1si
a3sk
a3so
3a3sp
a3ste
a3sti
a1ta1
a1te
a1ti
a4t5in
a1to
ato5v
a5tr
a1tu
a5va
a1ve
a5z
1ba
ba4ti
4bd
1be
be1k
be3ro
be5ru
be1s4
be1tr
1bi
bi5sk
b1j
4b1n
1bo
bo4gr
bo3ra
bo5re
1br4
4bs
bs5k
b3so
b1st
b5t
3bu
bu4s5tr
b5w
1by
by5s
4c1c
1ce
ce5ro
3ch
4ch.
ci4o
ck3
5cy
3da
4d3af
d5anta
da4s
d1b
d1d4
1de
de5d
4de4lem
der5eri
de4rig
de5sk
d1f
d1g
d3h
1di
di1e
di5l
d3j
d1k
d1l
d1m
4d1n
3do
4dop
d5ov
d1p
4drett
5d4reve
3drif
3driv
d5ros
d5ru
ds5an
ds5in
d1ski
d4sm
d4su
dsu5l
ds5vi
d3ta
d1te
dt5o
d5tr
dt5u
1du
dub5
d1v
3dy
e5ad
e3af
e5ag
e3ak
e1al
ea4la
e3an
e5ap
e3at
e3bl
ebs3
e1ci
ed5ar
edde4
eddel5
e4do
ed5ra
ed3re
ed3rin
ed4str
e3e
3eff
e3fr
3eft
e3gu
e1h
e3in
ei5s
e3je
e4j5el
e1ka
e3ke
e3kl
4e1ko
e5kr
ek5sa
3eksem
3eksp
e3ku
e1kv
e5ky
e3lad
el3ak
el3ar
e1las
e3le
e4lek
3elem
e1li
5elim
e3lo
el5sa
e5lu
e3ly
e4mad
em4p5le
em1s
en5ak
e4nan
4enn
e4no
en3so
e5nu
e5ol
e3op
e1or
e3ov
epi3
e1pr
e3ra
er3af
e4rag
e4rak
e1re
e4ref
er5ege
5erhv
e1ri
e4rib
er1k
ero5d
er5ov
er3s
er5tr
e3rum
er5un
e5ry
e1ta
e1te
etek4s
e1ti
e3tj
e1to
e3tr
e3tu
e1ty
e3um
e3un
3eur
e1va
e3ve
e4v3erf
e1vi
e5x
1fa
fa4ce
fags3
f1b
f1d
1fe
fej4
fejl1
f1f
f1g
f1h
1fi
f1k
3fl
1fo
for1en
fo4ri
f1p
f1s4
4ft
f3ta
f1te
f1ti
f5to
f5tvi
1fu
f1v
3fy
1ga
g3art
g1b
g1d
1ge
4g5enden
ger3in
ge3s
g3f
g1g
g1h
1gi
gi4b
gi3st
5gj
g3k
g1l
g1m
3go
4g5om
g5ov
g3p
1gr
gs1a
gsde4len
g4se
gsha4
g5sla
gs3or
gs1p
g5s4tide
g4str
gs1v
g3ta
g1te
g1ti
g5to
g3tr
gt4s
g3ud
gun5
g3v
1gy
g5yd
4ha.
heds3
he5s
4het
hi4e
hi4n5
hi3s
ho5ko
ho5ve
4h3t
hun4
hund3
hvo4
i1a
i3b
i4ble
i1c
i3dr
ids5k
i1el
i1en
i3er
i3et.
if3r
i3gu
i3h
i5i
i5j
i1ka
i1ke
ik1l
i5ko
ik3re
ik5ri
iks5t
ik4tu
i3ku
ik3v
i3lag
il3eg
il5ej
il5el
i3li
i4l5id
il3k
i1lo
il5u
i3mu
ind3t
5inf
ings1
in3s
in4sv
inter1
i3nu
i3od
i3og
i5ok
i3ol
ion4
ions1
i5o5r
i3ot
i5pi
i3pli
i5pr
i3re
i3ri
ir5t
i3sc
i3si
i4sm
is3p
i1ster
i3sti
i5sua
i1ta
i1te
i1ti
i3to
i3tr
it5re.
i1tu
i3ty
i1u
i1va
i1ve
i1vi
j3ag
jde4rer
jds1
jek4to
4j5en.
j5k
j3le
j3li
jlmeld5
jlmel4di
j3r
jre5
ju3s
5kap
k5au
5kav
k5b
kel5s
ke3sk
ke5st
ke4t5a
k3h
ki3e
ki3st
k1k
k5lak
k1le
3klu
k4ny
5kod
1kon
ko3ra
3kort
ko3v
1kra
5kry
ks3an
k1si
ks3k
ks1p
k3ste
k5stu
ks5v
k1t
k4tar
k4terh
kti4e
kt5re
kt5s
3kur
1kus
3kut
k4vo
k4vu
5lab
lad3r
5lagd
la4g3r
5lam
1lat
l1b
ldiagnos5
l3dr
ld3st
1le.
5led
4lele
le4mo
3len
1ler
1les
4leu
l1f
lfin4
lfind5
l1go1
l3h
li4ga
4l5ins
4l3int
li5o
l3j
l1ke
l1ko
l3ky
l1l
l5mu
lo4du
l3op
4l5or
3lov
4l3p
l4ps
l3r
4ls
lses1
ls5in
l5sj
l1ta
l4taf
l1te
l4t5erf
l3ti
lt3o
l3tr
l3tu
lu5l
l3ve
l3vi
1ma
m1b
m3d
1me
4m5ej
m3f
m1g
m3h
1mi
mi3k
m5ing
mi4o
mi5sty
m3k
m1l
m1m
mmen5
m1n
3mo
mo4da
4mop
4m5ov
m1pe
m3pi
m3pl
m1po
m3pr
m1r
mse5s
ms5in
m5sk
ms3p
m3ste
ms5v
m3ta
m3te
m3ti
m3tr
m1ud
1mul
mu1li
3my
3na
4nak
1nal
n1b
n1c
4nd
n3dr
nd5si
nd5sk
nd5sp
1ne
ne5a
ne4da
nemen4
nement5e
neo4
n3erk
n5erl
ne5sl
ne5st
n1f
n4go
4n1h
1ni
4nim
ni5o
ni3st
n1ke
n1ko
n3kr
n3ku
n5kv
4n1l
n1m
n1n
1no
n3ord
n5p
n3r
4ns
n3si
n1sku
ns3po
n1sta
n5sti
n1ta
nta4le
n1te
n1ti
ntiali4
n3to
n1tr
nt4s5t
nt4su
n3tu
n3ty
4n1v
3ny
n3z
o3a
o4as
ob3li
o1c
o4din
od5ri
od5s
od5un
o1e
of5r
o4gek
o4gel
o4g5o
og5re
og5sk
o5h
o5in
oi6s5e
o1j
o3ka
o1ke
o3ku
o3la
o3le
o1li
o1lo
o3lu
o5ly
1omr
on3k
ook5
o3or
o5ov
o3pi
op3l
op3r
op3s
3opta
4or.
or1an
3ordn
ord5s
o3re.
o3reg
o3rek
o3rer
o3re3s
o3ret
o3ri
3orient
or5im
o4r5in
or3k
or5o
or3sl
or3st
o3si
o3so
o3t
o1te
o5un
ov4s
3pa
pa5gh
p5anl
p3d
4pec
3pen
1per
pe1ra
pe5s
pe3u
p3f
4p5h
1pla
p4lan
4ple.
4pler
4ples
p3m
p3n
5pok
4po3re
3pot
4p5p4
p4ro
1proc
p3sk
p5so
ps4p
p3st
p1t
1pu
pu5b
p5ule
p5v
5py3
qu4
4raf
ra5is
4rarb
r1b
r4d5ar
r3dr
rd4s3
4reks
1rel
re5la
r5enss
5rese
re5spo
4ress
re3st
re5s4u
5rett
r1f
r1gu
r1h
ri1e
ri5la
4rimo
r4ing
ringse4
ringso4r
4rinp
4rint
r3ka
r1ke
r1ki
rk3so
r3ku
r1l
rmo4
r5mu
r1n
ro1b
ro3p
r3or
r3p
r1r
rre5s
rro4n5
r1sa
r1si
r5skr
r4sk5v
rs4n
r3sp
r5stu
r5su
r3sv
r5tal
r1te
r4teli
r1ti
r3to
r4t5or
rt5rat
rt3re
r5tri
r5tro
rt3s
r5ty
r3ud
run4da
5rut
r3va
r1ve
r3vi
ry4s
s3af
1sam
sa4ma
s3ap
s1ar
1sat
4s1b
s1d
sdy4
1se
s4ed
5s4er
se4se
s1f
4s1g4
4s3h
si4bl
1sig
s5int
5sis
5sit
5siu
s5ju
4sk.
1skab
1ske
s3kl
sk5s4
5sky
s1le
s1li
slo3
5slu
s5ly
s1m
s4my
4snin
s4nit
so5k
5sol
5som.
3somm
s5oms
5somt
3son
4s1op
sp4
3spec
4sper
3s4pi
s1pl
3sprog.
s5r4
s1s4
4st.
5s4tam
1stan
st5as
3stat
1stav
1ste.
1sted
3stel
5stemo
1sten
5step
3ster.
3stes
5stet
5stj
3sto
st5om
1str
s1ud
3sul
s3un
3sur
s3ve
3s4y
1sy1s
5ta.
1tag
tands3
4tanv
4tb
tede4l
teds5
3teg
5tekn
teo1
5term
te5ro
4t1f
6t3g
t1h
tialis5t
3tid
ti4en
ti3st
4t3k
4t1l
tli4s5
t1m
t1n
to5ra
to1re
to1ri
tor4m
4t3p
t4ra
4tres
tro5v
1try
4ts
t3si
ts4pa
ts5pr
t3st
ts5ul
4t1t
t5uds
5tur
t5ve
1typ
u1a
5udl
ud5r
ud3s
3udv
u1e
ue4t5
uge4ri
ugs3
u5gu
u3i
u5kl
uk4ta
uk4tr
u1la
u1le
u5ly
u5pe
up5l
u5q
u3ra
u3re
u4r3eg
u1rer
u3ro
us5a
u3si
u5ska
u5so
us5v
u1te
u1ti
u1to
ut5r
ut5s4
5u5v
va5d
3varm
1ved
ve4l5e
ve4reg
ve3s
5vet
v5h
vi4l3in
1vis
v5j
v5k
vl4
v3le
v5li
vls1
1vo
4v5om
v5p
v5re
v3st
v5su
v5t
3vu
y3a
y5dr
y3e
y3ke
y5ki
yk3li
y3ko
yk4s5
y3kv
y5li
y5lo
y5mu
yns5
y5o
y1pe
y3pi
y3re
yr3ek
y3ri
y3si
y3ti
y5t3r
y5ve
zi5o
.så3
.ær5i
.øv3r
a3tø
a5væ
brød3
5bæ
5drøv
dstå4
3dæ
3dø
e3læ
e3lø
e3rø
er5øn
e5tæ
e5tø
e1væ
e3æ
e5å
3fæ
3fø
fø4r5en
giø4
g4sø
g5så
3gæ
3gø1
3gå
i5tæ
i3ø
3kø
3kå
lingeniø4
l3væ
5løs
m5tå
1mæ
3mø
3må
n3kæ
n5tæ
3næ
4n5æb
5nø
o5læ
or3ø
o5å
5præ
5pæd
på3
r5kæ
r5tæ
r5tø
r3væ
r5æl
4røn
5rør
3råd
r5år
s4kå
3slå
s4næ
5stø
1stå
1sæ
4s5æn
1sø
s5øk
så4r5
ti4ø
3træk.
t4sø
t5så
t3væ
u3læ
3værd
1værk
5vå
y5væ
æb3l
æ3c
æ3e
æg5a
æ4gek
æ4g5r
ægs5
æ5i
æ5kv
ælle4
æn1dr
æ5o
æ1re
ær4g5r
æ3ri
ær4ma
ær4mo
ær5s
æ5si
æ3so
æ3ste
æ3ve
øde5
ø3e
ø1je
ø3ke
ø3le
øms5
øn3st
øn4t3
ø1re
ø3ri
ørne3
ør5o
ø1ve
å1d
å1e
å5h
å3l
å3re
års5t
å5sk
å3t
}
